Massachusetts, session 194th, S546.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 10 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 35SSS the following section:-
Section 35TTT. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the
commonwealth a separate fund to be known as the Quabbin Host Community Trust Fund to be
used, without further appropriation, by the secretary of energy and environmental affairs for the
municipal service, public safety, and development needs of Quabbin Reservoir watershed
communities, as defined by the department of conservation and recreation, including, but not
limited to, lands authorized to be taken under chapter 321 of the acts of 1927 or any successor
statute granting the taking of land for a similar purpose. All funds assessed and collected under
section 21 of chapter 92A½ shall be deposited into the fund. Any balance in the fund at the end
of 4

of the fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain available for expenditure in
subsequent fiscal years. No expenditure made from the fund shall cause the fund to become
deficient at any point during a fiscal year. Annually, not later than October 1, the secretary shall
file with the clerks of the senate and house of representatives and the house and senate
committees on ways and means a report of the fund’s activities, including but not limited to
expenditures made and income received by the fund.
(b) Annually the Massachusetts Water Resources Authority shall deposit $35,000,000
into the Quabbin Host Community Development Trust Fund, indexed to inflation. No less than
90% of funds deposited into the fund shall be expended in each fiscal year. No less than 70 per
cent of expenditures by the trust in each fiscal year shall be made to Quabbin Reservoir
watershed communities for municipal operations and capital improvements, including debt
service. No more than 25 per cent of expenditures by the trust in each fiscal year shall be made to
non-profit and cultural organizations directly serving the health, welfare, safety, and transit needs
of Quabbin Reservoir watershed communities as well as the Connecticut River Basin
communities and Chicopee River Basin communities. No more than 5 per cent of expenditures
by the trust in each fiscal year shall be to Quabbin Reservoir watershed communities for funding
projects pursuant to section 26 of chapter 165, including costs for the operations and
management of conduits, pipes, and hydrants constructed under the section.
(c) The secretary, in consultation with the several Select Boards of the Quabbin Reservoir
watershed communities, shall establish rules and regulations for the administration of the fund.
SECTION 2. The third paragraph of section 5G of chapter 59 of the General Laws is
hereby amended by striking out the second and third sentences and inserting in place thereof the
of 4

following sentences:- Said amounts to be held in trust as payments in lieu of taxes shall be made
on the total acreage in question that is held by each community; provided however, that the sum
of said payments shall not be less than $50,000 annually, and shall be valued in accordance with
the provisions of sections 13 to 17, inclusive, of chapter 58. In no event shall any city or town
receive an amount less than the payment received from the metropolitan district commission in
the prior fiscal year.
SECTION 3. Subsection (b) of section 3 of chapter 372 of the acts of 1984 is hereby
amended by striking out the words “one member of the board of directors who is a resident of a
Connecticut river basin community who represents water resources protection interests” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:- three members of the board of directors, one of
whom is a resident of a Quabbin Reservoir watershed community, as defined pursuant to section
35TTT of chapter 10 of the General Laws, in Franklin county, one of whom is a resident of a
Quabbin Reservoir watershed community in Hampshire county and one of whom is a resident of
a Quabbin Reservoir watershed community in Worcester county, each of whom shall represent
land and water resources protection and host community interests.
SECTION 4. Said subsection (b) of section 3 of chapter 372 of the acts of 1984 is hereby
further amended by striking out the words “a Connecticut river basin community shall include
any city or town in the commonwealth lying in whole or in part in the drainage area of the
Connecticut river or its tributaries” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- a
Quabbin reservoir watershed community as defined pursuant to section 35TTT of chapter 10 of
the General Laws.
of 4

SECTION 5. The first sentence of subsection (d) of said section 3 of said chapter 372 is
hereby amended by inserting after the word “reappointment” the following words:- ; provided,
however, that no member of the board of directors shall serve for more than 12 years, except the
secretary of the executive office of environmental affairs, serving ex officio.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no later than
December 31, 2026 the Massachusetts Water Resources Authority shall complete a Water
System Expansion Evaluation of the Westfield River Basin communities, Chicopee River Basin
communities, Connecticut River Basin communities, and Millers River Basin communities in a
manner consistent with the Evaluation of Ipswich River Basin completed by the Authority in
October 2022; provided, however, that notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 8 through 8D,
inclusive, of chapter 21 of the General Laws, the Water Resources Commission shall not approve
any interbasin transfer of water from the Quabbin Reservoir until said evaluation has been
completed. The evaluation shall be made available on the Massachusetts Water Resources
Authority's website and a copy shall be filed with the clerks of the house and senate and the
house and senate chairs of the committee on environment and natural resources.
SECTION 7. Section 1 of this act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
of 4